Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.007

Transaction of board's business in panels—Action by full board.

The board may meet and transact business in panels. Each board panel shall consist of at least two members of the board. In all matters concerning the internal affairs of the board and policy-making decisions, a majority of the full board must concur in such matters. The chair of the board with the consent of a majority of the board may designate any two members to exercise all the powers and duties of the board in connection with any hearing before the board. If the two members so designated cannot unanimously agree as to the disposition of the hearing assigned to them, such hearing shall be reheard by the full board. All actions of the full board shall be by concurrence of a majority of the sitting board members.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 18; 2011 c 336 s 337; 1986 c 224 s 5; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 63 s 1; 1959 c 32 s 3. Formerly RCW 43.67.035.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2011 c 336 s 337 and by 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 18, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Application—Recalculation of community custody terms—2011 1st sp.s. c 40: See note following RCW 9.94A.501.

Effective date—Severability—1986 c 224: See notes following RCW 9.95.001.